Utah statutes.
19-8-118.   Cleanups conducted prior to May 5, 1997.
(1)  A person who has completed a response action prior to May 5, 1997, at a
site that would have been eligible for participation in the program under this
chapter, may submit an application to the executive director under Section
19-8-107 for a certificate of completion under Section 19-8-111.
(2)  The application shall include information required by department rules
concerning the property addressed by the application and the response action
conducted at the site.
(3)  The executive director and applicant shall identify in the voluntary
agreement any necessary studies to be conducted by the applicant to
demonstrate the cleanup has been completed as provided in Section 19-8-110.
(4)  Applications submitted under this section are subject to Sections
19-8-110 through 19-8-113 to the extent those sections are applicable.
